Nevada, session 83, SB58.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 387.652 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.652 1. The Department shall, to the extent money is
available, award grants of money to school districts, sponsors of
charter schools and nonprofit organizations to support
prekindergarten programs. Each prekindergarten program supported
by a grant awarded pursuant to this section must:
(a) Employ at least one teacher per classroom who has a
bachelor’s degree or higher in early childhood education and
compensate those teachers with pay and benefits similar to those
provided to licensed teachers by the school district in which the
prekindergarten program is located;
(b) Serve children who are 4 years of age at the beginning of the
school year and [whose] :
(1) Whose household has a household income which is not
more than [200] 250 percent of the federally designated level
signifying poverty;
(2) Who have an individualized education program; or
(3) Who have a documented need for behavioral, social or
emotional supports;
(c) Provide instruction in prekindergarten for at least 25 hours
each week for the entire school year;
(d) Utilize a comprehensive curriculum for prekindergarten that
is aligned to any standards of content and performance established
for prekindergarten pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(e) Maintain the size of each class at not more than 20 pupils
and a ratio of not more than 10 pupils for each adult with
supervision in the classroom;
(f) Participate in any evaluation of the program or the pupils
who participate in the program that is prescribed by the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 387.656;
(g) Effectively engage the parents or guardians of pupils and
participate in any evaluation of such engagement that is required by
the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 387.656;
(h) Serve pupils with disabilities at a rate that is not less than the
percentage of pupils in this State or in the United States, whichever
is greater, who are 4 years of age at the beginning of the school year
who receive services funded pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1419;
(i) Ensure that the percentage of pupils with disabilities in each
class is less than 49 percent of the total number of pupils;
(j) Provide appropriate individualized accommodations and
supports for pupils with disabilities;
-
*SB58*

– 3 –
(k) Provide the comprehensive services prescribed pursuant to
NRS 387.656; and
(l) Meet the minimum standards of performance prescribed
pursuant to NRS 387.656.
2. If a school district, sponsor of a charter school or
nonprofit organization is awarded a grant of money pursuant to
this section, the Department shall determine the amount of the
grant by:
(a) For a school district or charter school, multiplying the
adjusted base per pupil funding amount established for that school
district or charter school for that school year by the number of
children served by the applicable prekindergarten program; or
(b) For a nonprofit organization, multiplying the adjusted base
per pupil funding amount established for a charter school in the
county in which the prekindergarten program provided by a
nonprofit organization is located by the number of children served
by the applicable prekindergarten program.
3. The board of trustees of a school district, the sponsor of a
charter school or a nonprofit organization that wishes to receive a
grant of money pursuant to this section must submit an application
to the Department. The application must include, without limitation:
(a) A detailed description of the manner in which the board of
trustees, sponsor of a charter school or nonprofit organization
proposes to:
(1) Ensure that the prekindergarten program supported by the
grant meets the requirements of subsection 1; and
(2) Use the grant of money; and
(b) Any other information required by the Department.
4. As used in this section, “individualized education
program” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. §
1414(d)(1)(A).
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB58*